Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 15 Care and Treatment of Cancer Patients

Cross references.

Cancer research program fund, §

31-12-14

.

Use of marijuana for treatment of cancer, §

43-34-120

et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Cancer state aid program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Public Health, Health Promotion, Subject 511-5-10.

31-15-1.
Findings; declaration of purpose.

It is declared and found that one of the most serious and tragic problems facing the public health and welfare is the death of thousands of persons in this state every year from cancer, although the present state of medical arts and technology could return many of these persons to a socially productive life. Advances and discoveries in the treatment of patients suffering from cancer now allow not mere survival, but rehabilitation of these patients to their normal occupations and activities. Presently, many of these patients are dying for lack of personal financial resources to pay for the care which they need.

The state recognizes its responsibilities to allow its citizens to keep their health without being pauperized and to use its resources and organization to aid in gathering and disseminating information on the treatment of cancer.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-2501a, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 753, § 1.

31-15-2.
Establishment of program.

The Department of Public Health shall establish a program for prevention, control, and treatment of cancer which shall include the care of cancer patients who require lifesaving therapy but are unable to pay for such services.

History.

Code 1933, § 2502a, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 753, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-15-3.
Functions of the Cancer Advisory Committee; membership; terms of office; vacancies.

The Governor shall appoint a Cancer Advisory Committee to advise the department in the administration of this chapter. The committee shall establish priorities and recommend relative budgets for the various purposes of this chapter as described below.

The Cancer Advisory Committee shall consist of 18 members appointed by the Governor as follows:

Four members representing medical schools as follows: The term of office of those two members appointed from a list of names submitted to the Governor by the deans of the medical schools located within this state, which members are serving as such on June 30, 1985, shall expire on that date and upon the appointment and qualification of the first two members appointed by the Governor in 1985 pursuant to this paragraph. On and after July 1, 1985, four membership positions on the committee shall represent the four medical schools, whether public or private, located within this state. The deans of those schools shall each submit to the Governor a list of three names and the Governor shall appoint one member from each of those four lists;

Two members shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of six names submitted to him by the chief executive officers of the hospitals or cancer clinics located within Georgia which are equipped to provide modern treatment for patients suffering from cancer;

Two members shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of six names submitted to him by the Medical Association of Georgia;

Two members shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of six names submitted to him by the American Cancer Society, Georgia Division;

The term of office of the two members appointed from the list of names submitted to the Governor by the Georgia Cancer Management Network, Inc., shall expire upon July 1, 1985, and such two membership positions shall thereafter be abolished;

One member shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of three names submitted to him by the Georgia Claims Association and the Georgia Chapter of the Health Insurance Association of America;

One member shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of three names submitted to him by the director of the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency;

Two members shall be selected by the Governor from the general public;

One member shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of three names submitted to him by the Georgia Nurses Association;

One member shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of three names submitted to him by the Georgia Association of Pathologists;

One member shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of three names submitted to him by the Georgia State Medical Association; and

One member shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of three names submitted to him by the Georgia Pharmaceutical Association.

The persons whose names are submitted to the Governor by the medical colleges, the hospitals, the Medical Association of Georgia, the Georgia State Medical Association, and the Georgia Association of Pathologists shall all be physicians licensed to practice medicine under the laws of Georgia, and the persons whose names are submitted by the Medical Association of Georgia and the Georgia State Medical Association shall all be actively engaged in the practice of medicine. The persons whose names are submitted to the Governor by the Georgia Nurses Association shall all be registered professional nurses licensed to practice nursing under the laws of Georgia. All persons whose names are submitted to the Governor by the Georgia Pharmaceutical Association shall be registered pharmacists licensed to practice pharmacy under the laws of Georgia.

The Governor shall appoint the initial members for staggered terms as follows: three shall be appointed for terms to expire on December 31, 1977; three shall be appointed for terms to expire on December 31, 1978; three shall be appointed for terms to expire on December 31, 1979; and six shall be appointed for terms to expire on December 31, 1980. Thereafter, their successors shall be appointed for terms of four years, and until their successors are appointed and qualified, to begin on the expiration of the respective terms of office. In the event of a vacancy for any reason, the Governor shall fill said vacancy for the unexpired term in the same manner that other appointments are made. Those initial members added to the committee in 1985 shall be appointed for initial terms beginning July 1, 1985, and expiring December 31, 1989, and upon the appointment and qualification of their respective successors. Thereafter, their successors shall be appointed for terms of four years and until their respective successors are appointed and qualified, such terms to begin on the expiration of the respective terms of office.

The Cancer Advisory Committee shall meet as often as the commissioner deems necessary but not less than twice each year.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-2503a, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 753, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 833, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1186, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 3; Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 3/HB 1146.

31-15-4.
Cancer control officer.

The commissioner shall appoint a cancer control officer. The cancer control officer shall be a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43 and shall be knowledgeable in the field of medicine covered by this chapter. He or she shall administer the cancer program for the Department of Public Health in compliance with this chapter. He or she shall be provided an office with clerical and administrative assistance to carry out this program.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-2504a, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 753, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-39/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-1/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-15-5.
Duties of commissioner.

The commissioner, with the advice of the Cancer Advisory Committee, shall:

Develop standards for determining eligibility of patients for care and treatment under this program, set standards for the equipping and staffing of cancer clinics located strategically throughout the state and so placed that patients requiring treatment will not have to travel more than 75 miles to secure such treatment. When the clinics meet such standards, they shall be certified by the department. Patients treated at uncertified cancer clinics shall not be eligible for state aid for reimbursement;

In the event that federal grant programs become available for patient care, the commissioner may allocate state matching funds in whatever department of state government they may be administered so as to maximize the total funds available and to obtain funding needed by the specific patient population which is declared eligible. These programs include but are not restricted to Medicaid, crippled children’s services, and vocational rehabilitation;

Extend financial aid to persons suffering from cancer to enable them to obtain the medical, nursing, pharmaceutical, and technical services necessary in caring for such disease. Criteria and procedures for financial aid will be developed by the Division of Physical Health in accordance with the principle that pauperization of a functional family unit will subvert the rehabilitative purposes of this program and will be more costly to the state in the long run;

Assist in the development and expansion, by grant or by contract, of programs for the care and treatment of persons suffering from cancer so that the most efficient and effective treatment may be offered to the patients certified as eligible;

Assist in the development of programs for the prevention of cancer;

Assist in the development and execution of programs for the early detection of cancer, such as breast self-examination for breast cancer and the Papanicolaou test for cancer of the cervix;

Institute and support, directly or through health organizations such as the American Cancer Society and the Georgia Cancer Management Network, educational programs for physicians, providers of health care, and the public concerning cancer, including the dissemination of information regarding prevention, early detection, and treatment; and

Support a state-wide registry of all patients treated in certified cancer clinics in order to evaluate the nature and extent of the incidence of cancer and the effectiveness of treatment.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-2505a, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 753, § 1.

31-15-6.
Right to benefits under other programs.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to exclude patients with cancer from the benefits of any program of state or federal aid for which they might otherwise qualify.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-2506a, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 753, § 1.